Massachusetts, session 194th, H257.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 140 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 6B the
following section:-
Section 6C. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Department”, the department of public health.
“Photographic or visual menu”, a menu that contains a written description accompanied
by a photograph each food and drink item to assist individuals with communication impairments
with ordering food and drink.
of 2

(b) A person licensed as an innholder or common victualler, when serving food, shall: (i)
maintain on the premises for availability upon customer request a set of photographic or visual
menus and (ii) include on all menus a notice to customers informing them of the availability of a
photographic or visual menu for customers with communication impairments, the language of
the notice shall be developed by the department in consultation with the department of
developmental services, the Massachusetts Restaurant Association and Arc Massachusetts, Inc..
(c) The department shall develop a program for restaurants to be designated as
“Communication Impairment Friendly” and shall maintain a listing of restaurants receiving that
designation on its website. Participation in the program shall be voluntary and the department, in
consultation with the Massachusetts Restaurant Association, shall issue guidelines and
requirements for restaurants to receive the designation; provided that the requirements shall
include, but not be limited to, maintaining on the premises and making available to the public, a
set of photographic or visual menus.
(d) The department may adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this section.
of 2